Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2608
Optometry; license; requirements.

Every applicant for a license to practice optometry shall: (1) Present proof that he or she is a graduate of an accredited school or college of optometry; and (2) pass an examination approved by the board. The examination shall cover all subject matter included in the practice of optometry.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 113, p. 487;

C.S.1929, § 71-1603;

R.S.1943, § 71-1,135;

Laws 1979, LB 9, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 323, § 3;

Laws 1998, LB 369, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 95;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,135;

Laws 2007, LB236, § 22;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 880.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.